Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2519.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; water conservation grant fund The sum of $100,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the water conservation grant fund established by section 49-1331, Arizona Revised Statutes.